Arkansas, session 2025, HB1586.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 20-77-124(a)(1), concerning the definition
of "autism spectrum disorder" relating to the Medicaid wavier for autism
spectrum disorder, is amended to read as follows:
(1) “Autism spectrum disorder” means a condition that is
diagnosed by at least two (2) qualified professionals of different types from
the list in subdivision (a)(4)(B) of this section who both each conclude that
a child fully meets the diagnostic criteria under the most recent edition of
the American Psychiatric Association's Diagnostic and Statistical Manual of
Mental Disorders;





*JMB165*
02/24/2025 4:40:25 PM JMB165